Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2499.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1512 of the act of June 2, 1915 (P.L.736, No.338), known as the Workers' Compensation Act, is amended to read:Section 1512. The board may invest any of the surplus or reserve belonging to the fund in such securities and investments as are authorized for investment by savings banks[.] and, notwithstanding section 1731-A of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, section 504 of the act of November 30, 1965 (P.L.847, No.356), known as the Banking Code of 1965, sections 922 and 922.1 of the former act of December 14, 1967 (P.L.746, No.345), known as the Savings 1234567891011121314151617181920 Association Code of 1967, and any other provision of law, may invest up to twenty per centum of any of the fund's assets in equity investments. INVESTMENTS SHALL BE MADE SUBJECT TO THE PRUDENT INVESTOR RULE AS PROVIDED FOR UNDER 20 PA.C.S. § 7203 (RELATING TO PRUDENT INVESTOR RULE). All such securities or evidences of indebtedness shall be placed in the hands of the State Treasurer who shall be the custodian thereof. [He] The State Treasurer shall collect the principal and interest thereof when due and pay the same into the fund. The State Treasurer shall pay for all such securities or evidences of indebtedness by check issued upon requisition of the secretary. All such payments shall be made only upon delivery of such securities or evidences of indebtedness to the State Treasurer. To all requisitions calling upon the State Treasurer to pay for any securities or evidences of indebtedness there shall be attached a certified copy of the resolution of the board authorizing the investment. The board may, upon like resolution, sell any of such securities.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2499PN3559 - 2 - <--12345678910111213141516171819